Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-163
Provisions of law; how construed.

On and after July 1, 2017, unless otherwise specified, whenever any provision of law refers to the Department of Aeronautics in connection with duties and functions transferred to the Division of Aeronautics of the Department of Transportation, such law shall be construed as referring to such division.

Laws 2017, LB339, § 53.